Massachusetts, session 194th, S2237.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 20 of chapter 239 of the acts of 2024 is hereby repealed.
SECTION 2. Section 21 of said chapter 239, as so appearing, is hereby repealed.
SECTION 3. The definition of “Small clean energy storage facility” in subsection (a) of
section 23 of said chapter 239, as so appearing, is hereby amended by inserting after the words
“operation of the small clean energy storage facility” the following words:- provided, that a
small clean energy storage facility shall not include pumped storage hydropower facilities.
SECTION 4. The definition of “Large clean energy storage facility” in section 57 of said
chapter 239, as so appearing, is hereby amended by inserting after the words “operation of the
large clean energy storage facility” the following words:- provided, that a large clean energy
storage facility shall not include pumped storage hydropower facilities.
of 2

SECTION 5. The first sentence of section 98 of said chapter 239, as so appearing, is
hereby amended by inserting after the words "provided, however, that existing energy storage
systems shall" the following word:- not
SECTION 6. The first sentence of section 105 of said chapter 239, as so appearing, is
hereby amended by striking out the following words:- , including nuclear power generation that
is located in the ISO-NE control area and commenced commercial operation before January 1,
2011.
of 2